California, session 20252026, AB1467.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2034 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:2034. If an insurer identifies a tree on an insured residential property as a fire risk that requires removal, and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection confirms that the tree is a fire risk, the policyholder shall be exempt from state and local laws, ordinances, fees, and fines associated with the removal of the tree.